Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-300 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “public school foundation” means a


nonprofit entity formed pursuant to the laws of this state that is


exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to either Section


501(c)(3) or Section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended.


B. Public school foundation expenditures on behalf of a public


school district in this state may include but not be limited to:


1. Expenses related to professional development for public


school district teachers and other staff;

Req. No. 3366 Page 1


2. Scholarships for school district employees and students;


3. Literacy initiatives including stipends for personnel and


supplies;


4. Equipment and supplies for science, technology, engineering,


and mathematics programs;


5. Technology support including hardware and software; and


6. Summer camp and conference fees for school district


personnel.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3366 EB 1/6/2026 2:00:16 PM



















Req. No. 3366 Page 2